Illinois, session 104th, HB2586.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Paragraph (14) of subsection (a) of Section 52605-35 of the Illinois State Police Law may be referred to as 6Alicia's Law. 7    Section 5. The State Employee Indemnification Act is 8amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 9    (5 ILCS 350/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1301)10    Sec. 1. Definitions. For the purpose of this Act: 11    (a) The term "State" means the State of Illinois, the 12General Assembly, the court, or any State office, department, 13division, bureau, board, commission, or committee, the 14governing boards of the public institutions of higher 15education created by the State, the Illinois National Guard, 16the Illinois State Guard, the Comprehensive Health Insurance 17Board, any poison control center designated under the Poison 18Control System Act that receives State funding, or any other 19agency or instrumentality of the State. It does not mean any 20local public entity as that term is defined in Section 1-206 of 21the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees Tort 22Immunity Act or a pension fund.   HB2586 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1    (b) The term "employee" means: any present or former 2elected or appointed officer, trustee or employee of the 3State, or of a pension fund; any present or former 4commissioner or employee of the Executive Ethics Commission or 5of the Legislative Ethics Commission; any present or former 6Executive, Legislative, or Auditor General's Inspector 7General; any present or former employee of an Office of an 8Executive, Legislative, or Auditor General's Inspector 9General; any present or former member of the Illinois National 10Guard while on active duty; any present or former member of the 11Illinois State Guard while on State active duty; individuals 12or organizations who contract with the Department of 13Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the 14Comprehensive Health Insurance Board, or the Department of 15Veterans' Affairs to provide services; individuals or 16organizations who contract with the Department of Human 17Services (as successor to the Department of Mental Health and 18Developmental Disabilities) to provide services including but 19not limited to treatment and other services for sexually 20violent persons; individuals or organizations who contract 21with the Department of Military Affairs for youth programs; 22individuals or organizations who contract to perform carnival 23and amusement ride safety inspections for the Department of 24Labor; individuals who contract with the Office of the State's 25Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor to provide legal services, but 26only when performing duties within the scope of the Office's   HB2586 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1prosecutorial activities; individual representatives of or 2designated organizations authorized to represent the Office of 3State Long-Term Ombudsman for the Department on Aging; 4individual representatives of or organizations designated by 5the Department on Aging in the performance of their duties as 6adult protective services agencies or regional administrative 7agencies under the Adult Protective Services Act; individuals 8or organizations appointed as members of a review team or the 9Advisory Council under the Adult Protective Services Act; 10individuals or organizations who perform volunteer services 11for the State where such volunteer relationship is reduced to 12writing; individuals who serve on any public entity (whether 13created by law or administrative action) described in 14paragraph (a) of this Section; individuals or not for profit 15organizations who, either as volunteers, where such volunteer 16relationship is reduced to writing, or pursuant to contract, 17furnish professional advice or consultation to any agency or 18instrumentality of the State; individuals who serve as foster 19parents for the Department of Children and Family Services 20when caring for youth in care as defined in Section 4d of the 21Children and Family Services Act; individuals who serve as 22members of an independent team of experts under the 23Developmental Disability and Mental Health Safety Act (also 24known as Brian's Law); and individuals who serve as 25arbitrators pursuant to Part 10A of Article II of the Code of 26Civil Procedure and the rules of the Supreme Court   HB2586 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1implementing Part 10A, each as now or hereafter amended; the 2members of the Certification Review Panel under the Illinois 3Police Training Act; the term "employee" does not mean an 4independent contractor except as provided in this Section. The 5term includes (1) an individual appointed as an inspector by 6the Director of the Illinois State Police when performing 7duties within the scope of the activities of a Metropolitan 8Enforcement Group or a law enforcement organization 9established under the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act; (2) 10any Metropolitan Enforcement Group created under the 11Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement Act if all sworn 12members of the Metropolitan Enforcement Group are employees 13under this Act; and (3) any law enforcement organization 14established under a written agreement under the 15Intergovernmental Cooperation Act for the purpose of enforcing 16and investigating the offenses listed in paragraph (4) of 17Section 3 of the Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement Act, 18or similar offenses, if the Illinois State Police is a party to 19the agreement and all sworn members of the law enforcement 20organization are employees under this Act. An individual who 21renders professional advice and consultation to the State 22through an organization which qualifies as an "employee" under 23the Act is also an employee. The term includes the estate or 24personal representative of an employee. 25    (c) The term "pension fund" means a retirement system or 26pension fund created under the Illinois Pension Code.  HB2586 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 2102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 3    Section 10. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 4Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 5Sections 2605-5, 2605-30, 2605-35, and 2605-45 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-5)7    Sec. 2605-5. Definitions. In this Law:8    "CJIS Systems Agency" means the agency responsible for 9establishing and administering an information technology 10security program throughout the agency's user community, 11including the local levels.12    "Criminal Justice Information System" or "CJIS" means any 13system, including the equipment, facilities, procedures, and 14agreements, accepted and adopted by the criminal justice 15community for the collection, processing, preservation, and 16dissemination of criminal justice information, including, but 17not limited to, biometric data, identity history data, 18biographic data, property data, case or incident history, 19arrest records, warrants, incarceration and correctional data, 20firearms background checks, and sex offender registry. 21    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois State 22Police.23    "Missing endangered senior" means an individual 65 years 24of age or older or a person with Alzheimer's disease or related   HB2586 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1dementias who is reported missing to a law enforcement agency 2and is, or is believed to be:3        (1) a temporary or permanent resident of Illinois;4        (2) at a location that cannot be determined by an 5    individual familiar with the missing individual; and6        (3) incapable of returning to the individual's 7    residence without assistance. 8(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 9    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-30)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a-2)10    Sec. 2605-30. Division of Patrol (formerly State 11Troopers). The Division of Patrol shall exercise the following 12functions and those in Section 2605-35:13        (1) Cooperate with federal and State authorities 14    requesting utilization of the Illinois State Police's 15    radio network system under the Illinois Aeronautics Act.16        (2) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties of the 17    Illinois State Police under the Illinois State Police Act.18        (2.5) Provide uniformed patrol of Illinois highways 19    and proactively enforce criminal and traffic laws. 20        (3) (Blank).21        (4) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties of the 22    Illinois State Police vested by law in the Illinois State 23    Police by the Illinois Vehicle Code.24        (5) Exercise other duties that have been or may be 25    vested by law in the Illinois State Police.  HB2586 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1        (6) Exercise other duties that may be assigned by the 2    Director in order to fulfill the responsibilities and to 3    achieve the purposes of the Illinois State Police.4        (7) Provide comprehensive law enforcement services to 5    the public and to county, municipal, and federal law 6    enforcement agencies, at their request.7        (8) Patrol Illinois highways with the intent to 8    interdict crime and ensure traffic safety while assisting 9    citizens during times of need. 10        (9) Enforce the provisions of Chapter 18b of the 11    Illinois Vehicle Code. 12(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-35)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a-3)14    Sec. 2605-35. Division of Criminal Investigation.15    (a) The Division of Criminal Investigation shall exercise 16the following functions and those in Section 2605-30:17        (1) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested by 18    law in the Illinois State Police by the Illinois Horse 19    Racing Act of 1975, including those set forth in Section 20    2605-215.21        (2) Investigate the origins, activities, personnel, 22    and incidents of crime and enforce the criminal laws of 23    this State related thereto.24        (3) Enforce all laws regulating the production, sale, 25    prescribing, manufacturing, administering, transporting,   HB2586 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1    having in possession, dispensing, delivering, 2    distributing, or use of controlled substances and 3    cannabis.4        (4) Cooperate with the police of cities, villages, and 5    incorporated towns and with the police officers of any 6    county in enforcing the laws of the State and in making 7    arrests and recovering property.8        (5) Apprehend and deliver up any person charged in 9    this State or any other state with treason or a felony or 10    other crime who has fled from justice and is found in this 11    State.12        (6) Investigate recipients and providers under the 13    Illinois Public Aid Code and any personnel involved in the 14    administration of the Code who are suspected of any 15    violation of the Code pertaining to fraud in the 16    administration, receipt, or provision of assistance and 17    pertaining to any violation of criminal law; and exercise 18    the functions required under Section 2605-220 in the 19    conduct of those investigations.20        (7) Conduct other investigations as provided by law, 21    including, but not limited to, investigations of human 22    trafficking, illegal drug trafficking, illegal firearms 23    trafficking, and cyber crimes that can be investigated and 24    prosecuted in Illinois.25        (8) Investigate public corruption.26        (9) Exercise other duties that may be assigned by the   HB2586 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1    Director in order to fulfill the responsibilities and 2    achieve the purposes of the Illinois State Police, which 3    may include the coordination of gang, terrorist, and 4    organized crime prevention, control activities, and 5    assisting local law enforcement in their crime control 6    activities.7        (10) Conduct investigations (and cooperate with 8    federal law enforcement agencies in the investigation) of 9    any property-related crimes, such as money laundering, 10    involving individuals or entities listed on the sanctions 11    list maintained by the U.S. Department of Treasury's 12    Office of Foreign Asset Control. 13        (11) Oversee Illinois State Police special weapons and 14    tactics (SWAT) teams, including law enforcement response 15    to weapons of mass destruction.16        (12) Oversee Illinois State Police air operations.17        (13) Investigate criminal domestic terrorism 18    incidents, and otherwise deter all criminal threats to 19    Illinois.20        (14) Conduct investigations into Internet crimes 21    against children and provide support to applicable 22    statewide task forces. 23    (a-5) The Division of Criminal Investigation shall gather 24information, intelligence, and evidence to facilitate the 25identification, apprehension, and prosecution of persons 26responsible for committing crime; to provide specialized   HB2586 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1intelligence and analysis, investigative, tactical, and 2technological services in support of law enforcement 3operations throughout the State of Illinois; and to oversee 4and operate the statewide criminal intelligence fusion center. 5    (b) (Blank).6    (b-5) The Division of Criminal Investigation shall 7cooperate and liaise with all federal law enforcement and 8other partners on criminal investigations, intelligence, 9information sharing, and national security planning and 10response. 11    (c) The Division of Criminal Investigation shall provide 12statewide coordination and strategy pertaining to 13firearm-related intelligence, firearms trafficking 14interdiction, and investigations reaching across all divisions 15of the Illinois State Police, including providing crime gun 16intelligence support for suspects and firearms involved in 17firearms trafficking or the commission of a crime involving 18firearms that is investigated by the Illinois State Police and 19other federal, State, and local law enforcement agencies, with 20the objective of reducing and preventing illegal possession 21and use of firearms, firearms trafficking, firearm-related 22homicides, and other firearm-related violent crimes in 23Illinois. 24(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 25102-1108, eff. 12-21-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-34, eff. 261-1-24; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB2586 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-45)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a-5)2    Sec. 2605-45. Division of Justice Services. 3    (a) The Division of Justice Services shall provide 4administrative and technical services and support to the 5Illinois State Police, criminal justice agencies, and the 6public and shall exercise the following functions:7        (1) Operate and maintain the Law Enforcement Agencies 8    Data System (LEADS), a statewide, computerized 9    telecommunications system designed to provide services, 10    information, and capabilities to the law enforcement and 11    criminal justice community in the State of Illinois. The 12    Director is responsible for establishing policy, 13    procedures, and regulations consistent with State and 14    federal rules, policies, and law by which LEADS operates. 15    The Director shall designate a statewide LEADS 16    Administrator for management of the system. The Director 17    may appoint a LEADS Advisory Policy Board to reflect the 18    needs and desires of the law enforcement and criminal 19    justice community and to make recommendations concerning 20    policies and procedures.21        (2) Pursue research and the publication of studies 22    pertaining to local law enforcement activities.23        (3) Serve as the State's point of contact for the 24    Federal Bureau of Investigation's Uniform Crime Reporting 25    Program and National Incident-Based Reporting System.  HB2586 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1        (4) Operate an electronic data processing and computer 2    center for the storage and retrieval of data pertaining to 3    criminal activity.4        (5) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested in 5    the Illinois State Police by the Cannabis Regulation and 6    Tax Act and the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 7    Program Act.8        (6) (Blank).9        (6.5) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested 10    in the Illinois State Police by the Firearm Owners 11    Identification Card Act, the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, 12    the Firearm Transfer Inquiry Program, the prohibited 13    persons portal under Section 2605-304, and the Firearm 14    Dealer License Certification Act.15        (7) Exercise other duties that may be assigned by the 16    Director to fulfill the responsibilities and achieve the 17    purposes of the Illinois State Police.18        (8) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested by 19    law in the Illinois State Police by the Criminal 20    Identification Act and the Illinois Uniform Conviction 21    Information Act. 22        (9) Exercise the powers and perform the duties that 23    have been vested in the Illinois State Police by the 24    Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth Registration 25    Act, the Sex Offender Registration Act, and the Sex 26    Offender Community Notification Law and adopt reasonable   HB2586 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1    rules necessitated thereby. 2        (10) Serve as the State central repository for 3    criminal history record information.4        (11) Share all necessary information with the 5    Concealed Carry Licensing Review Board and the Firearms 6    Owner's Identification Card Review Board necessary for the 7    execution of their duties.8        (12) Serve as the CJIS Systems Agency for Illinois.9    (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the CJIS 10Security Policy of the Federal Bureau of Investigation governs 11criminal justice information systems and requires all of those 12systems to be subject to a management control agreement 13controlled by the criminal justice agency that owns the 14criminal justice information system and to be subject to 15oversight by the CJIS Systems Agency. The CJIS Systems Agency 16shall establish principles and standards to provide 17consistency in the operation and use of criminal justice 18system information technology throughout the State. The CJIS 19Systems Agency may impose more stringent or additional 20protection measures than those measures outlined in the CJIS 21Security Policy of the Federal Bureau of Investigation if the 22protection measures are documented and maintained. State 23agencies and units of local government shall work with the 24CJIS Systems Agency to follow all principles and standards, 25including those imposed under this Section. Consistent with 26the CJIS Security Policy of the Federal Bureau of   HB2586 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 11397 RTM 21485 b1Investigation, no State agency, unit of local government, or 2employee of a State agency or unit of local government shall 3usurp, replace, or diminish the role and responsibility of the 4CJIS Information Security Officer or the CJIS Systems Officer 5appointed by the head of the CJIS Systems Agency. 6(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Section and Section 15 8take effect October 1, 2025.